District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.21a

Training standards for all providers.

All homeless service workers, including intake workers, shall be trained in cultural competence, including, with regard to the LGBTQ population, the following:

(1)

Vocabulary and best practices for data collection, privacy, storage, and use;

(2)

Current social science research and common risk factors for LGBTQ youth;

(3)

Information about the coming out process and its impact on LGBTQ youth;

(4)

Best practices for supporting LGBTQ youth in shelter, housing, and supportive services;

(5)

Suicide awareness and prevention; and

(6)

Legal requirements for providers for homeless youth.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 12a
as added May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-100, § 2(h), 61 DCR 1873

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-756.02.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-100 added this section.